District of Columbia statutes.
29-305.01

Annual meeting.

(a)

Unless directors are elected by written consent in lieu of an annual meeting as permitted by § 29-305.04, a corporation shall hold a meeting of shareholders annually at a time stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws. However, if a corporation’s articles of incorporation authorize shareholders to cumulate their votes when electing directors pursuant to § 29-305.28, directors shall not be elected by less than unanimous consent.

(b)

Annual shareholders’ meetings may be held in or outside of the District at the place stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws. If no place is stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws, annual meetings shall be held at the corporation’s principal office.

(c)

The failure to hold an annual meeting at the time stated in or fixed in accordance with a corporation’s bylaws shall not affect the validity of any corporate action.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720